North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 9. Dispositions.
§ 7B-908.
Post termination of parental rights’ placement court review.

The purpose of each placement review is to ensure that every reasonable effort is being made to provide for the permanent plan for the juvenile who has been placed in the custody of a county director or licensed child-placing agency, which is consistent with the juvenile’s best interests. At each review hearing the court may consider information from the department of social services, the licensed child-placing agency, the guardian ad litem, the child, the person providing care for the child, and any other person or agency the court determines is likely to aid in the review. The court may consider any evidence, including hearsay evidence as defined in

G.S. 8C-1

, Rule 801, that the court finds to be relevant, reliable, and necessary to determine the needs of the juvenile and the most appropriate disposition.

The court shall conduct a placement review not later than six months from the date of the termination hearing when both parents’ parental rights have been terminated by a petition or motion brought by any person or agency designated in G.S. 7B-1103(a)(2) through (6), or one parent’s parental rights have been terminated by court order and the other parent’s parental rights have been relinquished under Chapter 48 of the General Statutes, and a county director or licensed child-placing agency has custody of the juvenile. The court shall conduct reviews every six months thereafter until the juvenile is the subject of a decree of adoption:

No more than 30 days and no less than 15 days prior to each review, the clerk shall give notice of the review to the juvenile if the juvenile is at least 12 years of age, the legal custodian or guardian of the juvenile, the person providing care for the juvenile, the guardian ad litem, if any, and any other person or agency the court may specify. The department of social services shall either provide to the clerk the name and address of the person providing care for the child for notice under this subsection or file written documentation with the clerk that the child’s current care provider was sent notice of hearing. Only the juvenile, the legal custodian or guardian of the juvenile, the person providing care for the juvenile, and the guardian ad litem may participate in the review hearings, except as otherwise directed by the court. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to make the person a party to the proceeding solely based on receiving notice and the right to be heard. Any individual whose parental rights have been terminated or has executed a relinquishment that is no longer revocable shall not be considered a party to the proceeding unless an appeal of the order terminating parental rights is pending, and a court has stayed the order pending the appeal.

If a guardian ad litem for the juvenile has not been appointed previously by the court in the termination proceeding, the court, at the initial six-month review hearing, may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the juvenile. The court may continue the case for such time as is necessary for the guardian ad litem to become familiar with the facts of the case.

The court shall consider at least the following in its review and make written findings regarding the following that are relevant:

The adequacy of the permanency plans developed by the county department of social services or a licensed child-placing agency for a permanent placement in the juvenile’s best interests and the efforts of the department or agency to implement the plans.

Whether the juvenile has been listed for adoptive placement with NC Kids Adoption and Foster Care Network or any other child-specific recruitment program or whether there is an exemption to listing that the court finds is in the child’s best interest.

The efforts previously made by the department or agency to find a permanent placement for the juvenile.

Whether the current placement is in the juvenile’s best interest.

The court, after making findings of fact, shall do one of the following it finds to be in the best interests of the child:

Affirm the county department’s or child placing agency’s plan.

Order a different plan designated in G.S. 7B-906.2(a).

(d1)

The court may (i) order concurrent permanent plans if the court finds concurrent permanency planning to be in the best interests of the juvenile and (ii) specify efforts that are necessary to accomplish a permanent plan designated in subdivisions (1) or (2) of subsection (d) of this section that is in the best interests of the juvenile. If a juvenile is not placed with prospective adoptive parents as selected in

G.S. 7B-1112.1

, the court may order a placement that the court finds to be in the juvenile’s best interest after considering the department’s recommendations.

If the juvenile is the subject of a decree of adoption prior to the date scheduled for the review, within 10 days of receiving notice that the adoption decree has been entered, the department of social services shall file with the court and serve on any guardian ad litem for the juvenile written notice of the entry. The adoption decree shall not be filed in the court file. The review hearing shall be cancelled with notice of said cancellation given by the clerk to all persons previously notified.

(e1)

The order shall be reduced to writing, signed, and entered no later than 30 days following the completion of the hearing. If the order is not entered within 30 days following completion of the hearing, the clerk of court for juvenile matters shall schedule a subsequent hearing at the first session of court scheduled for the hearing of juvenile matters following the 30-day period to determine and explain the reason for the delay and to obtain any needed clarification regarding the contents of the order. The order shall be entered within 10 days of the subsequent hearing required by this subsection.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-295, s. 10, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to actions filed or pending on or after that date.

History.

1983, c. 607, s. 1; 1993, c. 537, s. 2; 1998-202, s. 6; 1998-229, ss. 9, 26; 1999-456, s. 60; 2003-62, s. 4; 2005-398, s. 8; 2007-276, s. 5; 2009-311, s. 8; 2011-295, s. 10; 2013-129, s. 27; 2017-161, s. 9; 2019-33, s. 12; 2021-100, s. 12.

§ 7B-909.
Review of agency’s plan for placement.

The director of social services or the director of the licensed private child-placing agency shall promptly notify the clerk to calendar the case for review of the department’s or agency’s plan for the juvenile at a session of court scheduled for the hearing of juvenile matters if the juvenile is in the custody of the department or agency and has not become the subject of a decree of adoption within six months following relinquishment of the juvenile for adoption by a parent, guardian, or guardian ad litem under the provisions of Part 7 of Article 3 of Chapter 48 of the General Statutes.

Repealed by 2007-276, s. 6, effective October 1, 2007.

(b1)

If the court finds on motion of a department of social services or licensed child-placing agency that a consent or relinquishment for adoption necessary for the juvenile to be adopted cannot be obtained, and that no further steps are being taken to terminate the parental rights of the parent from whom consent or relinquishment has not been obtained, the court may order, upon finding that it is in the juvenile’s best interest, that any relinquishment for adoption signed by a parent who has surrendered the child for adoption shall be voided pursuant to G.S. 48-3-707(a)(4). Before voiding any relinquishment under this subsection, the court shall require the county department of social services or licensed child-placing agency to give at least 15 days’ notice to the relinquishing parent whose rights will be restored. The relinquishing parent shall have the right to be heard on (i) whether the relinquishment should be voided and (ii) the parent’s plan to provide for the juvenile if the relinquishment is voided. If after due diligence the relinquishing parent cannot be located, the notice of hearing shall be deposited in the United States mail, return receipt requested, and sent to the address of the parent given in the relinquishment. The date of receipt of the notice is deemed the date of delivery or last attempted delivery.

Notification of the court under this section shall be by a petition for review or motion for review, if the court is exercising jurisdiction over the juvenile. The review shall be conducted within 30 days following the filing of the petition for review unless the court shall otherwise direct. The court shall conduct reviews every six months until the juvenile is the subject of a decree of adoption. However, further reviews are not required after the voiding of a relinquishment under subsection (b1) of this section. The initial review and all subsequent reviews, except a review hearing under subsection (b1) of this section, shall be conducted pursuant to

G.S. 7B-908

. Any individual whose parental rights have been terminated or who has relinquished the juvenile for adoption under the provisions of Part 7 of Article 3 of Chapter 48 of the General Statutes shall not be considered a party to the review unless an appeal of the order terminating parental rights is pending, and a court has stayed the order pending the appeal.

History.

1983, c. 607, s. 2; 1993, c. 537, s. 4; 1995, c. 457, s. 6; 1998-202, s. 6; 1998-229, s. 9; 1999-456, s. 60; 2005-398, s. 9; 2007-276, s. 6; 2013-129, s. 28; 2013-236, s. 1; 2013-410, s. 27.

§ 7B-909.1.
Relinquishment to a department of social services.

Before the relinquishment of a juvenile to a department of social services for the purpose of adoption may be executed by a parent who is a respondent in an action under this Subchapter and (i) whose retained counsel has entered a notice of appearance or (ii) who has an attorney whose provisional appointment has been confirmed by the court, each of the following shall occur:

Notice shall be given by any reasonable and timely means of communication to the parent’s counsel or, if such counsel is unavailable, to the partner or employee at the attorney’s office that the department has made arrangements for the parent to execute a relinquishment at a specific date, time, and location.

The parent shall be advised of the right to seek the advice of the parent’s counsel prior to executing the relinquishment and to have the parent’s counsel present while executing the relinquishment.

History.

2019-33, s. 13.

§ 7B-910.
Review of voluntary foster care placements.

The court shall review the placement of any juvenile in foster care made pursuant to a voluntary agreement between the juvenile’s parents or guardian and a county department of social services and shall make findings from evidence presented at a review hearing with regard to:

The voluntariness of the placement;

The appropriateness of the placement;

Whether the placement is in the best interests of the juvenile; and

The services that have been or should be provided to the parents, guardian, foster parents, and juvenile, as the case may be, either (i) to improve the placement or (ii) to eliminate the need for the placement.

The court may approve the continued placement of the juvenile in foster care on a voluntary agreement basis, disapprove the continuation of the voluntary placement, or direct the department of social services to petition the court for legal custody if the placement is to continue.

An initial review hearing shall be held not more than 90 days after the juvenile’s placement and shall be calendared by the clerk for hearing within such period upon timely request by the director of social services. An additional review hearing shall be held 90 days thereafter and any review hearings at such times as the court shall deem appropriate and shall direct, either upon its own motion or upon written request of the parents, guardian, foster parents, or director of social services. A juvenile placed under a voluntary agreement between the juvenile’s parent or guardian and the county department of social services shall not remain in placement more than six months without the filing of a petition alleging abuse, neglect, or dependency.

The clerk shall give at least 15 days’ advance written notice of the initial and subsequent review hearings to the parents or guardian of the juvenile, to the juvenile if 12 or more years of age, to the director of social services, and to any other persons whom the court may specify.

History.

1983, c. 607, s. 2; 1993, c. 537, s. 4; 1995, c. 457, s. 6; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2001-208, s. 21; 2001-487, s. 101.

§ 7B-910.1.
Review of voluntary foster care placements with young adults.

The court shall review the placement of a young adult in foster care authorized by

G.S. 108A-48(c)

when the director of social services and a young adult who was in foster care as a juvenile enter into a voluntary placement agreement. The review hearing shall be held not more than 90 days from the date the agreement was executed, and the court shall make findings from evidence presented at this review hearing with regard to all of the following:

Whether the placement is in the best interest of the young adult in foster care.

The services that have been or should be provided to the young adult in foster care to improve the placement.

The services that have been or should be provided to the young adult in foster care to further the young adult’s educational or vocational ambitions, if relevant.

Upon written request of the young adult or the director of social services, the court may schedule additional hearings to monitor the placement and progress toward the young adult’s educational or vocational ambitions.

No guardian ad litem under

G.S. 7B-601

will be appointed to represent the young adult in the initial or any subsequent hearing.

The clerk shall give written notice of the initial and any subsequent review hearings to the young adult in foster care and the director of social services at least 15 days prior to the date of the hearing.

When the young adult elects to terminate the agreement, the agreement may be terminated without a return to court. When the department elects to terminate the agreement over the objection of the young adult, the department shall file a motion to bring the matter back before the court for resolution.

History.

2015-241, s. 12C.9(g); 2017-161, s. 10; 2021-100, s. 13.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-161, s. 10, effective October 1, 2017, substituted “in foster care” for “and foster care” in subsection (d).

Session Laws 2021-100, s. 13, effective October 1, 2021, added subsection (e).

§ 7B-911.
Civil child custody order.

Upon placing custody with a parent or other appropriate person, the court shall determine whether or not jurisdiction in the juvenile proceeding should be terminated and custody of the juvenile awarded to a parent or other appropriate person pursuant to

G.S. 50-13.1

, 50-13.2, 50-13.5, and 50-13.7.

When the court enters a custody order under this section, the court shall either cause the order to be filed in an existing civil action relating to the custody of the juvenile or, if there is no other civil action, instruct the clerk to treat the order as the initiation of a civil action for custody.If the order is filed in an existing civil action and the person to whom the court is awarding custody is not a party to that action, the court shall order that the person be joined as a party and that the caption of the case be changed accordingly. The order shall resolve any pending claim for custody and shall constitute a modification of any custody order previously entered in the action.If the court’s order initiates a civil action, the court shall designate the parties to the action and determine the most appropriate caption for the case. The civil filing fee is waived unless the court orders one or more of the parties to pay the filing fee for a civil action into the office of the clerk of superior court. The order shall constitute a custody determination, and any motion to enforce or modify the custody order shall be filed in the newly created civil action in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 50 of the General Statutes. The Administrative Office of the Courts may adopt rules and shall develop and make available appropriate forms for establishing a civil file to implement this section.

When entering an order under this section, the court shall satisfy the following:

Make findings and conclusions that support the entry of a custody order in an action under Chapter 50 of the General Statutes or, if the juvenile is already the subject of a custody order entered pursuant to Chapter 50, makes findings and conclusions that support modification of that order pursuant to

G.S. 50-13.7

.

Make the following findings:

There is not a need for continued State intervention on behalf of the juvenile through a juvenile court proceeding.

At least six months have passed since the court made a determination that the juvenile’s placement with the person to whom the court is awarding custody is the permanent plan for the juvenile, though this finding is not required if the court is awarding custody to a parent or to a person with whom the child was living when the juvenile petition was filed.

History.

2005-320, s. 4; 2013-129, s. 29.

§ 7B-912.
Juveniles 14 years of age and older; Another Planned Permanent Living Arrangement.

In addition to the permanency planning requirements under

G.S. 7B-906.1

, at every permanency planning hearing for a juvenile in the custody of a county department of social services who has attained the age of 14 years, the court shall inquire and make written findings regarding each of the following:

The services provided to assist the juvenile in making a transition to adulthood.

The steps the county department of social services is taking to ensure that the foster family or other licensed placement provider follows the reasonable and prudent parent standard as provided in

G.S. 131D-10.2

A.

Whether the juvenile has regular opportunities to engage in age-appropriate or developmentally appropriate activities.

At or before the permanency planning hearing immediately following the juvenile’s seventeenth birthday and at each permanency planning hearing thereafter, the court shall (i) inquire as to whether the juvenile has a copy of the juvenile’s birth certificate, Social Security card, health insurance information, drivers license or other identification card, any educational or medical records the juvenile requests, and information about how the juvenile may participate in the foster care 18-21 program authorized by

G.S. 108A-48

, and (ii) determine the person or entity that should assist the juvenile in obtaining these documents before the juvenile attains the age of 18 years.

(b1)

The department shall include in its report to the court at every hearing after the juvenile’s seventeenth birthday all of the following information:

The department’s efforts to identify and secure viable placement options for when the juvenile attains the age of 18 years.

A list of appropriate adults who can serve as resources for the juvenile when the juvenile attains the age of 18 years.

Contact information of the person responsible for overseeing voluntary foster care placements with young adults in the county department of social services with custody or placement responsibility of the juvenile and in the county department of social services in the county where the juvenile plans to reside at the age of 18 years.

If appropriate, whether the juvenile has information about how he or she may maintain contact with his or her siblings, parents, or relatives when the juvenile attains the age of 17 years.

Whether the department has provided the juvenile with a point of contact to secure Medicaid and maintain physical and mental health services for which the juvenile will be eligible when the juvenile attains the age of 18 years.

Whether the department has provided the juvenile with information about educational, vocational, or job plans for when the juvenile attains the age of 18 years.

If the court finds each of the following conditions applies, the court shall approve Another Planned Permanent Living Arrangement (APPLA) as defined by P.L. 113-183, as the juvenile’s primary permanent plan:

The juvenile is 16 or 17 years old.

The county department of social services has made diligent efforts to place the juvenile permanently with a parent or relative or in a guardianship or adoptive placement.

Compelling reasons exist that it is not in the best interest of the juvenile to be placed permanently with a parent or relative or in a guardianship or adoptive placement.

APPLA is the best permanency plan for the juvenile.

If the court approves APPLA as the juvenile’s permanent plan, the court shall, after questioning the juvenile, make written findings addressing the juvenile’s desired permanency outcome.

History.

2015-135, s. 2.6; 2015-136, s. 15; 2021-100, ss. 14, 15.